Colorado, session 2026A, HB1006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Expanding educational opportunities and improving outcomes
for historically underserved student populations, including Hispanic or
Latino students, first-generation students, students with low incomes, adult
learners, transfer students, and students attending colleges and universities
in rural areas, are compelling state interests that are critical to Colorado's
prosperity, civil vitality, and workforce talent pipeline;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Recognition of institutional performance should be grounded in
student outcomes and performance rather than being based solely on
enrollment share;
(c) Increasing degree and credential attainment through student
persistence, retention, and successful transfers and aligning education and
training to labor market outcomes are necessary to achieve the state's
postsecondary attainment and workforce goals;
(d) The Colorado commission on higher education's strategic plan
calls for increasing the number of Coloradans with skills obtained while in
high school or through postsecondary education that, at a minimum, result
in lifetime earnings that exceed the cost of attendance; and
(e) Outcome-based state designations recognizing institutional
excellence provide policy continuity, promote accountability, and support
continuous improvement aligned with the state's attainment and workforce
goals.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 23-1-144 as
follows:
23-1-144. Thriving institution designations - advisory committee
- report - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADVISORY COMMITTEE" MEANS THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON
THRIVING INSTITUTION OUTCOMES CREATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)
OF THIS SECTION.
(b) "INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS A PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, INCLUDING A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-71-102, AND AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 23-60-103.
(c) "LABOR MARKET OUTCOMES" MEANS THE INCOME EARNINGS OF
STUDENTS UPON POSTSECONDARY-EDUCATION COMPLETION CATEGORIZED
BY DEGREE USING EXISTING STATE OR FEDERAL DATA ALREADY COLLECTED
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

OR MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(d) "RURAL CAMPUS" MEANS A CAMPUS OF AN INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS RURAL BASED ON GEOGRAPHIC ISOLATION,
POPULATION DENSITY, COMMUNITY, STUDENT ENROLLMENT, OR OTHER
FACTORS, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(e) "STUDENT SUCCESS EXPERT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WITH
DEMONSTRATED EXPERTISE IN ASSISTING POSTSECONDARY STUDENTS WITH
SUCCESSFUL CREDENTIAL AND DEGREE COMPLETION OR EVIDENCE-BASED
PRACTICES TO CLOSE ATTAINMENT GAPS AMONG HISTORICALLY
UNDERSERVED STUDENT POPULATIONS.
(f) "THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATION" MEANS A DESIGNATION
GRANTED TO A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(2) A THRIVING INSTITUTION IS A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT DEMONSTRATES STRONG PERFORMANCE, AS DEFINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT WITH INPUT FROM THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, FOR CERTAIN STUDENT
POPULATIONS, INSTITUTIONAL MISSIONS, OR WORKFORCE ROLES THAT ARE
RECOGNIZED IN:
(a) FEDERAL LAW, INCLUDING THOSE NOTED IN THE FEDERAL
"HIGHER EDUCATION ACT OF 1965", 20 U.S.C. SEC. 1001 AND 20 U.S.C.
SEC. 1057-1059d;
(b) FEDERAL STUDENT AID AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAMS
AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO 20 U.S.C. SEC. 1070a;
(c) THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE AND EDUCATION-TO-WORKFORCE
ACCOUNTABILITY FRAMEWORKS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO 29 U.S.C. SEC.
3111 ET SEQ.;
(d) COLORADO STATUTES GOVERNING HIGHER EDUCATION,
WORKFORCE PROGRAMS, AND ADULT EDUCATION; AND
(e) FEDERAL OR STATE ACCOUNTABILITY, REPORTING, OR DATA
SYSTEMS AUTHORIZED BY STATUTE.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

(3) (a) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS. AFTER THE DEPARTMENT
ESTABLISHES THE INITIAL THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS AND THE
OUTCOME STANDARDS USED TO INFORM THE THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATIONS AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, AND AS
SOON AS PRACTICABLE FOLLOWING THE ANNUAL PUBLIC RELEASE OF
ENROLLMENT, RETENTION, AND GRADUATION DATA FROM EACH STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN 2027 AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT, WITH INPUT FROM THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE, IF THE
ADVISORY COMMITTEE HAS SCHEDULED MEETINGS FOR THAT CALENDAR
YEAR, SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT MEET THE
OUTCOME STANDARDS IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION FOR
ONE OR MORE THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS;
(II) NOTIFY EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT MEETS
THE OUTCOME STANDARDS IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION
FOR ONE OR MORE THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS AND REQUEST THAT
THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION RESPOND WITHIN TEN CALENDAR
DAYS WITH A DECISION OF WHETHER THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION WOULD LIKE TO BE RECOGNIZED FOR ITS THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATION;
(III) POST ON THE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE THE NAMES OF THE
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT EARN A THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATION AND AGREE TO BE RECOGNIZED FOR THEIR THRIVING
INSTITUTION DESIGNATION; AND
(IV) NOTIFY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE NAME OF EACH
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT EARNS A THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATION.
(b) THE OUTCOME STANDARDS USED TO DETERMINE THRIVING
INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS, AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, MUST BE USED TO IMPROVE OUTCOMES FOR THE STUDENT
POPULATIONS IMPACTED BY A THRIVING INSTITUTION'S DESIGNATION
WITHOUT DIMINISHING THE SUCCESS OF OTHER STUDENT POPULATIONS AT
THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

(c) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S DESIGNATION AS A
THRIVING INSTITUTION DOES NOT CREATE AN ENTITLEMENT TO STATE
FUNDING AND DOES NOT REQUIRE THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO REPLACE OR
SUPPLEMENT FEDERAL OR PRIVATE FUNDING TO THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
(4) AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SET OUTCOME STANDARDS, MEASURES, DATA SOURCES, CALCULATION
METHODS, VALIDITY PROTECTIONS, PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS, MULTI-TIER
RECOGNITION LEVELS, AND REVIEW PERIODS USED TO EVALUATE
INSTITUTIONAL PERFORMANCE FOR THE THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATIONS. THE STANDARDS MUST:
(a) RELY EXCLUSIVELY ON EXISTING STATE OR FEDERAL DATA
COLLECTED OR MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND NOT REQUIRE NEW
DATA ELEMENTS, NEW DATA COLLECTION, DATA MATCHING, OR
DATA-SHARING AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCIES OR
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(b) UTILIZE EXISTING METHODS OF COHORTING AND CALCULATING
OUTCOME AND PERFORMANCE METRICS;
(c) ENSURE STATISTICAL VALIDITY AND COMPLIANCE WITH PRIVACY
LAWS;
(d) PROMOTE CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT ALIGNED WITH THE
STATE'S ESTABLISHED POSTSECONDARY ATTAINMENT TARGETS AND
STATEWIDE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENTAL PRIORITIES; AND
(e) AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE EXISTING DATA CONCERNING STUDENT
PROGRESSION AND SUCCESS, SUCH AS DEGREE COMPLETION, RETENTION, AND
LABOR MARKET OUTCOMES.
(5) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONVENE AN ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON THRIVING INSTITUTION OUTCOMES.
THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING THE 2027
CALENDAR YEAR TO PROVIDE INPUT ON THE INITIAL THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATIONS AND THE OUTCOME STANDARDS USED TO INFORM THE
THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS. ONCE THIS PURPOSE IS FULFILLED,
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL MEET ONLY IF NEW THRIVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATIONS NEED TO BE ADDED OR IF THE COMMISSION PROPOSES
MATERIAL CHANGES TO THE OUTCOME STANDARDS USED TO INFORM THE
THRIVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATIONS.
(b) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS,
EACH APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM A FOUR-YEAR UNIVERSITY;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM A COMMUNITY COLLEGE, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 23-81-101;
(III) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 23-71-102;
(IV) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM A RURAL CAMPUS;
(V) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT RECEIVED A HISPANIC-SERVING INSTITUTION DESIGNATION
FROM THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ON OR BEFORE
DECEMBER 31, 2025;
(VI) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT RECEIVED A FIRST GENERATION-SERVING INSTITUTION
DESIGNATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025;
(VII) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT RECEIVED A NATIVE AMERICAN-SERVING NON-TRIBAL
INSTITUTION DESIGNATION FROM THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025;
(VIII) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION WITH A POPULATION OF PELL-ELIGIBLE UNDERGRADUATE
STUDENTS GREATER THAN THE STATEWIDE AVERAGE;
(IX) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT HAS A POPULATION OF ADULT LEARNERS AND TRANSFER
STUDENTS THAT IS GREATER THAN THE STATEWIDE AVERAGE;
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

(X) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE COLORADO BUSINESS COMMUNITY
WITH EXPERIENCE IN WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT OR EMPLOYER
ENGAGEMENT RELATED TO POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION EMPLOYMENT AND
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT;
(XI) AT LEAST TWO INDIVIDUALS WITH RESEARCH EXPERTISE IN THE
FIELD OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR A CLOSELY RELATED DISCIPLINE;
(XII) A STUDENT ENROLLED AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION;
(XIII) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES
PROGRAM OVERSIGHT AND POLICY GUIDANCE FOR FEDERALLY, STATE, AND
LOCALLY FUNDED WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS;
(XIV) A STUDENT SUCCESS REPRESENTATIVE WITH DEMONSTRATED
EXPERIENCE IN STUDENT AFFAIRS; AND
(XV) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH EXPERTISE IN LAWFUL DATA USE
RELATED TO POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION AND METHODS FOR ENSURING
COMPLIANCE WITH STATE AND FEDERAL PRIVACY LAWS.
(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPOINT
INDIVIDUALS TO THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE THAT MEET THE APPOINTMENT
CRITERIA OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE AND SIT ON ANOTHER COUNCIL,
COMMISSION, OR STAKEHOLDER GROUP IN ORDER TO AVOID DUPLICATION
AND REDUCE ADMINISTRATIVE BURDEN.
(d) MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE MAY
SATISFY MULTIPLE MEMBERSHIP CATEGORIES DETAILED IN SUBSECTION
(5)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(e) THE MEMBERS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SERVE WITHOUT
COMPENSATION BUT MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR ACTUAL AND NECESSARY
EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

(7) ALL USE AND DISCLOSURE OF STUDENT INFORMATION FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION MUST COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND
FEDERAL PRIVACY LAWS. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AGGREGATE DATA TO
PREVENT THE DISCLOSURE OF STUDENT PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE
INFORMATION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1006

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1006